Oklahoma, session 2025, SB470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3604, as


last amended by Section 157, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (68 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 3604), is amended to read as follows:


Section 3604. A. Except as otherwise provided in subsection I


or subsection L of this section, an establishment which meets the


qualifications specified in the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act


may receive quarterly incentive payments for a ten-year period from


the Oklahoma Tax Commission pursuant to the provisions of the


Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act; provided, such an establishment


defined or classified in the NAICS Manual under U.S. Industry No.


711211 (2007 version) may receive quarterly incentive payments for a

Req. No. 224 Page 1


thirty-year period. The amount of such payments shall be equal to


the net benefit rate multiplied by the actual gross payroll of new


direct jobs for a calendar quarter as verified by the Oklahoma


Employment Security Commission. For an establishment defined or


classified in the NAICS Manual under U.S. Industry No. 711211 (2007


version) that entered into a contract pursuant to the Oklahoma


Quality Jobs Program Act with the Oklahoma Department of Commerce


before the effective date of this act November 1, 2023:


1. The contract shall be extended from fifteen (15) years to


thirty (30) years; and


2. The extension shall not include additional money awarded but


shall allow for payments to continue for the thirty-year period, or


until the net benefit for the new direct jobs for the original


contract has been fully paid out as calculated based upon the


original application.


B. In order to receive incentive payments, an establishment


shall apply to the Oklahoma Department of Commerce. The application


shall be on a form prescribed by the Department and shall contain


such information as may be required by the Department to determine


if the applicant is qualified. An establishment may apply for an


effective date for a project, which shall not be more than twenty-


four (24) months from the date the application is submitted to the


Department.



Req. No. 224 Page 2


C. Except as otherwise provided by subsection D or E of this


section, in order to qualify to receive such payments, the


establishment applying shall be required to:


1. Be engaged in a basic industry;


2. Have an annual gross payroll for new direct jobs projected


by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce to equal or exceed Two


Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) within three


(3) years of the first complete calendar quarter following the start


date; and


3. Have a number of full-time-equivalent employees subject to


the tax imposed by Section 2355 of this title and working an annual


average of thirty (30) or more hours per week in new direct jobs


located in this state equal to or in excess of eighty percent (80%)


of the total number of new direct jobs; and


4. For applications submitted after the effective date of this


act, provide at least twelve (12) weeks of paid family leave and at


least two (2) weeks of additional paid leave for new direct jobs.


For the purposes of this paragraph, “paid family leave” shall


include:


a. all leave entitled to eligible employees as otherwise


provided in the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993,


U.S.C., Section 2601 et seq., and


b. payment for leave equal to at least one hundred


percent (100%) of the employee’s wage.

Req. No. 224 Page 3


D. In order to qualify to receive incentive payments as


authorized by the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act, an


establishment engaged in an activity described under:


1. Industry Group Nos. 3111 through 3119 of the NAICS Manual


shall be required to:


a. have an annual gross payroll for new direct jobs


projected by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce to


equal or exceed One Million Five Hundred Thousand


Dollars ($1,500,000.00) within three (3) years of the


first complete calendar quarter following the start


date and make, or which will make within one (1) year,


at least seventy-five percent (75%) of its total


sales, as determined by the Incentive Approval


Committee pursuant to the provisions of subsection B


of Section 3603 of this title, to out-of-state


customers or buyers, to in-state customers or buyers


if the product or service is resold by the purchaser


to an out-of-state customer or buyer for ultimate use,


or to the federal government, unless the annual gross


payroll equals or exceeds Two Million Five Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) in which case the


requirements for purchase of output provided by this


subparagraph shall not apply, and



Req. No. 224 Page 4


b. have a number of full-time-equivalent employees


working an average of thirty (30) or more hours per


week in new direct jobs equal to or in excess of


eighty percent (80%) of the total number of new direct


jobs; and


2. Division (4) of subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection


A of Section 3603 of this title, shall be required to:


a. have an annual gross payroll for new direct jobs


projected by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce to


equal or exceed One Million Five Hundred Thousand


Dollars ($1,500,000.00) within three (3) years of the


first complete calendar quarter following the start


date, and


b. have a number of full-time-equivalent employees


working an average of thirty (30) or more hours per


week in new direct jobs equal to or in excess of


eighty percent (80%) of the total number of new direct


jobs.


E. 1. An establishment which locates its principal business


activity within a site consisting of at least ten (10) acres which:


a. is a federal Superfund removal site,


b. is listed on the National Priorities List established


under 42 U.S.C., Section 9605 of Title 42 of the


United States Code,

Req. No. 224 Page 5


c. has been formally deferred to the state in lieu of


listing on the National Priorities List, or


d. has been determined by the Department of Environmental


Quality to be contaminated by any substance regulated


by a federal or state statute governing environmental


conditions for real property pursuant to an order of


the Department of Environmental Quality,


shall qualify for incentive payments irrespective of its actual


gross payroll or the number of full-time-equivalent employees


engaged in new direct jobs.


2. In order to qualify for the incentive payments pursuant to


this subsection, the establishment shall conduct the activity


resulting in at least fifty percent (50%) of its Oklahoma taxable


income or adjusted gross income, as determined under Section 2358 of


this title, whether from the sale of products or services or both


products and services, at the physical location which has been


determined not to comply with the federal or state statutes


described in this subsection with respect to environmental


conditions for real property. The establishment shall be subject to


all other requirements of the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act


other than the exemptions provided by this subsection.


3. In order to qualify for the incentive payments pursuant to


this subsection, the entity shall obtain from the Department of


Environmental Quality a letter of concurrence that:

Req. No. 224 Page 6


a. the site designated by the entity does meet one or


more of the requirements listed in paragraph 1 of this


subsection, and


b. the site is being or has been remediated to a level


which is consistent with the intended use of the


property.


In making its determination, the Department of Environmental


Quality may rely on existing data and information available to it,


but may also require the applying entity to provide additional data


and information, as necessary.


4. If authorized by the Department of Environmental Quality


pursuant to paragraph 3 of this subsection, the entity may utilize a


remediated portion of the property for its intended purpose prior to


remediation of the remainder of the site, and shall qualify for


incentive payments based on employment associated with the portion


of the site.


F. Except as otherwise provided by subsection G of this


section, for applications submitted on and after June 4, 2003, in


order to qualify to receive incentive payments as authorized by the


Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act, in addition to other


qualifications specified herein, an establishment shall be required


to pay new direct jobs an average annualized wage which equals or


exceeds:



Req. No. 224 Page 7


1. One hundred ten percent (110%) of the average county wage as


determined by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce based on the most


recent U.S. Department of Commerce data for the county in which the


new direct jobs are located. For purposes of this paragraph, health


care premiums paid by the applicant for individuals in new direct


jobs shall be included in the annualized wage; or


2. One hundred percent (100%) of the average county wage as


that percentage is determined by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce


based upon the most recent U.S. Department of Commerce data for the


county in which the new jobs are located. For purposes of this


paragraph, health care premiums paid by the applicant for


individuals in new direct jobs shall not be included in the


annualized wage.


Provided, no average wage requirement shall exceed Twenty-five


Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), in any county. This maximum wage


threshold shall be indexed and modified from time to time based on


the latest Consumer Price Index year-to-date percent change release


as of the date of the annual average county wage data release from


the Bureau of Economic Analysis of the U.S. Department of Commerce.


G. 1. As used in this subsection, “opportunity zone” means one


or more census tracts in which, according to the most recent Federal


Decennial Census, at least thirty percent (30%) of the residents


have annual gross household incomes from all sources below the


poverty guidelines established by the U.S. Department of Health and

Req. No. 224 Page 8


Human Services. An establishment which is otherwise qualified to


receive incentive payments and which locates its principal business


activity in an opportunity zone shall not be subject to the


requirements of subsection F of this section.


2. As used in this subsection:


a. “negative economic event” means:


(1) a man-made disaster or natural disaster as


defined in Section 683.3 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, resulting in the loss of a


significant number of jobs within a particular


county of this state, or


(2) an economic circumstance in which a significant


number of jobs within a particular county of this


state have been lost due to an establishment


changing its structure, consolidating with


another establishment, closing or moving all or


part of its operations out of this state, and


b. “significant number of jobs” means Local Area


Unemployment Statistics (LAUS) data, as determined by


the Bureau of Labor Statistics, for a county which are


equal to or in excess of five percent (5%) of the


total amount of Local Area Unemployment Statistics


(LAUS) data for that county for the calendar year, or



Req. No. 224 Page 9


most recent twelve-month period in which employment is


measured, preceding the event.


An establishment which is otherwise qualified to receive


incentive payments and which locates in a county in which a negative


economic event has occurred within the eighteen-month period


preceding the start date shall not be subject to the requirements of


subsection F of this section; provided, an establishment shall not


be eligible to receive incentive payments based upon a negative


economic event with respect to jobs that are transferred from one


county of this state to another.


H. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce shall determine if the


applicant is qualified to receive incentive payments.


I. If the applicant is determined to be qualified by the


Oklahoma Department of Commerce and is not subject to the provisions


of subparagraph d of paragraph 7 of subsection A of Section 3603 of


this title, the Department shall conduct a cost/benefit analysis to


determine the estimated net direct state benefits and the net


benefit rate applicable for a ten-year period beginning with the


first complete calendar quarter following the start date and to


estimate the amount of gross payroll for a ten-year period beginning


with the first complete calendar quarter following the start date or


for a thirty-year period for an establishment defined or classified


in the NAICS Manual under U.S. Industry No. 711211 (2007 version).


In conducting such cost/benefit analysis, the Department shall

Req. No. 224 Page 10


consider quantitative factors, such as the anticipated level of new


tax revenues to the state along with the added cost to the state of


providing services, and such other criteria as deemed appropriate by


the Department. In no event shall incentive payments, cumulatively,


exceed the estimated net direct state benefits, except for


applicants subject to the provisions of subparagraph d of paragraph


of subsection A of Section 3603 of this title.


J. Upon approval of such an application, the Oklahoma


Department of Commerce shall notify the Tax Commission and shall


provide it with a copy of the contract and the results of the


cost/benefit analysis. The Tax Commission may require the qualified


establishment to submit such additional information as may be


necessary to administer the provisions of the Oklahoma Quality Jobs


Program Act. The approved establishment shall file quarterly claims


with the Tax Commission and shall continue to file such quarterly


claims during the ten-year incentive period to show its continued


eligibility for incentive payments, as provided in Section 3606 of


this title, or until it is no longer qualified to receive incentive


payments. The establishment may be audited by the Tax Commission to


verify such eligibility. Once the establishment is approved, an


agreement shall be deemed to exist between the establishment and the


State of Oklahoma, requiring the continued incentive payment to be


made as long as the establishment retains its eligibility as defined


in and established pursuant to this section and Sections 3603 and

Req. No. 224 Page 11


3606 of this title and within the limitations contained in the


Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act, which existed at the time of such


approval. An establishment described in this subsection shall be


required to repay all incentive payments received under the Oklahoma


Quality Jobs Program Act if the establishment is determined by the


Oklahoma Tax Commission to no longer have business operations in the


state within three (3) years from the beginning of the calendar


quarter for which the first incentive payment claim is filed.


K. A municipality with a population of less than one hundred


thousand (100,000) persons in which an establishment eligible to


receive quarterly incentive payments pursuant to the provisions of


this section is located may file a claim with the Tax Commission for


up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount of such payment. The


amount of such claim shall not exceed amounts paid by the


municipality for direct costs of municipal infrastructure


improvements to provide water and sewer service to the


establishment. Such claim shall not be approved by the Tax


Commission unless the municipality and the establishment have


entered into a written agreement for such claims to be filed by the


municipality prior to submission of the application of the


establishment pursuant to the provisions of this section. If such


claim is approved, the amount of the payment to the establishment


made pursuant to the provisions of Section 3606 of this title shall


be reduced by the amount of the approved claim by the municipality

Req. No. 224 Page 12


and the Tax Commission shall issue a warrant to the municipality in


the amount of the approved claim in the same manner as warrants are


issued to qualifying establishments.


L. For any contract executed by an establishment on or after


August 2, 2018, five percent (5%) of the quarterly incentive payment


amount shall be transferred by the Oklahoma Tax Commission to the


Oklahoma Quick Action Closing Fund.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-224 QD 1/19/2025 5:37:03 AM





























Req. No. 224 Page 13